District of Columbia statutes.
34-2306

Rules.

(a)

Within 60 days of June 13, 1990, the Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of this act [D.C. Law 8-136] including rules regarding deposits, meters, liens, the sale and redemption of real property, the amnesty program, receivership, termination of water and sewer services, and administrative review.

(b)

The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

(c)

If after 90 days from June 13, 1990, the Mayor has failed to issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of this act [D.C. Law 8-136] as provided in subsection (a) of this section, the Council may adopt any legislation necessary to accomplish the purposes of this act. [D.C. Law 8-136]

June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-136, § 8, 37 DCR 2620
This section is referenced in § 34-2303 and § 34-2305.
1981 Ed., § 43-1656.
“This act,” referred to in (a) and in two places in (c), is D.C. Law 8-136.